Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 13 School Finance

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Funds § 1 et seq.; 64 Am. Jur. 2d Public Securities and Obligations §§ 120 to 122; 68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 51 to 58.

79 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 522 to 645.